Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2283.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1519(c) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1519. Determination of incompetency.* * *(c) Recall or suspension of operating privilege.--[The] (1) Except as provided under subsection (d), the department shall recall the operating privilege of any person whose incompetency has been established under the provisions of this chapter. The recall shall be for an indefinite period until satisfactory evidence is presented to the department in accordance with regulations to establish that such person is competent to drive a motor vehicle.(2) The department shall suspend the operating privilege 12345678910111213141516171819 of any person who refuses or fails to comply with the requirements of this section until [that] the person [does comply] complies and [that] the person's competency to drive is established.(3) Any person aggrieved by recall or suspension of the operating privilege may appeal in the manner provided in section 1550. The judicial review shall be limited to whether the person is competent to drive in accordance with the provisions of the regulations promulgated under section 1517 (relating to Medical Advisory Board).(d) Coronary condition exemption.--(1) Notwithstanding subsection (c), the department may not recall the operating privilege of an individual who experiences a syncope due to a coronary condition if the following conditions are met:(i) The coronary condition can be treated, as determined by a physician, by the medical implantation of a pacemaker into the individual.(ii) A pacemaker in proper working condition has been medically implanted into the individual.(iii) The individual has not experienced a syncope for at least seven days from the date of the medical implantation of the pacemaker.(iv) The individual's physician provides a report to the department attesting to the following:(A) The requirements of subparagraphs (i), (ii) and (iii) have been met.(B) The medical installation of the pacemaker has a reasonable expectation to prevent the individual from experiencing a syncope in the future.20260HB2283PN2989 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) The individual is physically qualified to drive.(2) If the individual experiences an additional syncope after the submission of the report to the department under paragraph (1), the physician shall report the individual's syncope to the department, and the department may recall the operating privilege of the individual.(3) The provisions of subsection (b) relating to the confidentiality of reports and use of reports as evidence shall apply to reports made by a physician under this subsection.(4) Section 1518 (relating to reports on mental or physical disabilities or disorders) shall apply to reports made by a physician under this subsection.(5) This subsection shall not apply to the suspension, revocation, recall, disqualification or cancellation of a commercial driver's license.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2283PN2989 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718